es: Toxicidad para mascotas: Ligeramente tóxico; No tóxico; Tóxico; Desconocido; Otros
pl: Toksyczność dla zwierząt domowych: Lekko toksyczny; Nietoksyczne; Toksyczny; Nieznane; Pozostałe
hu: Háziállat-toxicitás: Enyhén mérgező; Nem mérgező; Mérgező; Ismeretlen; Egyéb
en: Pet toxicity: Mildly toxic; Non-toxic; Toxic; Unknown; Other
de: Toxizität für Haustiere: Leicht giftig; Ungiftig; Giftig; Unbekannt; Sonstiges
tr: Evcil hayvan toksisitesi: Hafif toksik; Toksik değil; Toksik; Bilinmeyen; Diğer
el: Τοξικότητα για κατοικίδια: Ελαφρώς τοξικό; Μη τοξικό; Τοξικός; Άγνωστο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Toksičnost za hišne ljubljenčke: Rahlo strupeno; Nestrupeno; Strupeno; Neznano; Druga
pt-PT: Toxicidade para animais de estimação: Levemente tóxico; Não tóxico; Tóxico; Desconhecido; Outro
sv: Djurgiftighet: Milt giftig; Giftfri; Toxisk; Okänd; Övrigt
lt-LT: Augintiniams toksiškumas: Silpnai toksiškas; Netoksiškas; Toksiška; Nežinoma; Kita
zh-CN: 宠物毒性: 轻微毒性; 无毒; 有毒; 未知; 其他
it: Tossico per animali domestici: Leggermente tossico; Non tossico; Tossico; Sconosciuto; Altro
ru: Токсичность для домашних животных: Слаботоксично; Нетоксичное; Токсично; Неизвестно; Другое
sk-SK: Toxicita pre domáce zvieratá: Mierne toxické; Netoxický; Toxický; Neznáme; Iné
bg-BG: Токсичност за домашни любимци: Леко токсично; Нетоксично; Токсично; Неизвестно; Друго
th: ความเป็นพิษต่อสัตว์เลี้ยง: เป็นพิษเล็กน้อย; ปลอดสารพิษ; เป็นพิษ; ไม่ทราบสาเหตุ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Toxicitatea pentru animalele de companie: Ușor toxic; Netoxic; Toxic; Necunoscut; Altele
nb: Giftighet for kjæledyr: Mildt giftig; Ikke-giftig; Giftig; Ukjent; Annet
fi: Lemmikkimyrkyllisyys: Lievästi myrkyllinen; Myrkytön; Myrkyllinen; Tuntematon; Muu
fr: Toxicité pour les animaux domestiques: Légèrement toxique; Non toxique; Toxique; Inconnu; Autre
cs: Toxicita pro domácí mazlíčky: Mírně toxická; Netoxické; Toxická; Není známo; Jiné
pt-BR: Toxicidade para animais de estimação: Levemente tóxico; Não tóxico; Tóxico; Desconhecido; Outro
hr-HR: Toksičnost za kućne ljubimce: Blago otrovno; Netoksično; Otrovno; Unknown; Ostalo
ja: ペットに対する毒性: 軽度の毒性; 無毒; 有毒; 不明; その他
nl: Giftigheid voor huisdieren: Licht giftig; Niet-giftig; Giftig; Onbekend; Overig
vi: Độ độc hại với thú cưng: Độc tính nhẹ; Không độc hại; Có độc; Không rõ; Khác
ko: 반려동물 독성 여부: 약한 독성; 무독성; 독성 있음; 알 수 없음; 기타
zh-TW: 寵物毒性: 輕微毒性; 無毒; 有毒; 未知; 其他
da: Giftighed for kæledyr: Mildt giftig; Ikke-giftig; Giftig; Ukendt; Andet